Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2134
Marriage and family therapists; act, how construed.

Nothing in the Mental Health Practice Act shall be construed to require the State of Nebraska, any agency of the State of Nebraska, or any of the entities which operate under rules and regulations of a state agency, which employ or contract for the services of marriage and family therapists, to employ or contract with only persons certified pursuant to the act for the performance of any of the professional activities enumerated in section 38-2119.

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 51;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,332;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 751.